Utah statutes.
78B-3-601.   Purpose.

(1)  The purpose of this part is to facilitate the compensation of injured parties from financial protection funds established pursuant to the Price Anderson Act, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 2210.

(2)  Nothing in this part may be construed to impose liability for harm from nuclear incidents for which financial protection is not afforded under the Price Anderson Act.

